Massachusetts, session 194th, H1718.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 272 of the General Laws, as so appearing, is hereby amended by
striking out Section 22 and inserting in place thereof the following:— Section 22. Whoever
conceals the death of a child, so that it cannot be ascertained whether it was born alive or, if born
alive, whether it was murdered, shall be punished by imprisonment in the state prison for not
more than 5 years or in a house of correction for not more than two and one-half years.
SECTION 2. Chapter 272 of the General Laws, as so appearing, is hereby further
amended by inserting after Section 22 the following section:— Section 22A. Unless otherwise
provided by law, whoever trades, sells or arranges for the sale of a minor child to another person
for money or property, real or personal, or anything else of value, or whoever receives such
of 2

minor child for such payment or thing of value shall be punished by imprisonment in state prison
for not more than five years or in a house of correction for not more than two and one-half years.
of 2